Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2668 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Vision Plan
Contractual Requirements Act”.
B. As used in this act:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1343 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. “Health maintenance organization” means an organization
licensed in this state by the Insurance Commissioner pursuant to
Section 6902 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. “Insurer” means an insurance company licensed in this state
by the Commissioner;
3. “Nonprofit optometric service and indemnity corporations”
means corporations organized pursuant to Sections 2601 through 2667
of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. “Subscriber” means an individual who is enrolled in an
individual or group vision plan as a principal subscriber and
dependents who are entitled to vision services and material under
the vision service plan solely because of their status as dependents
of the principal subscriber;
5. “Subscribership coverage” means any certificate or contract
issued to a subscriber specifying the vision coverage to which the
subscriber is entitled;
6. “Vision plan organization” means any affiliate, subsidiary,
agent, contractor, subcontractor, or other designee of a person or
entity including, but not limited to, an insurer, health maintenance
organization, or nonprofit optometric service and indemnity
corporation that markets, sells, offers, issues, underwrites,
administers, manages, conducts, operates, establishes fee schedules
or reimbursement rates, adjudicates, pays claims for, or provides
utilization management or prior authorization for, or exercises
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1343 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cont rol over, one or more prepaid, discount, or reimbursement vision
service plans;
7. “Vision service plan” means a contractual arrangement where
any vision plan organization pays for, reimburses, or discounts the
cost of vision services whether offered on a stand-alone basis or as
a part of, or as a rider to, any other health, welfare, or insurance
coverage and regardless of the form of consideration including, but
not limited, to premiums, subscription fees, administrative fees,
capitation, or other renumeration; and
8. “Vision services” means services or materials including, but
not limited to, exams, eyeglasses, or contact lenses.
C. No contract between a vision plan organization and an
optometrist shall require an optometrist to provide services to
subscribers at a fee set by the vision plan organization unless the
services are covered vision services under the applicable vision
service plan.
D. All vision service plans offered by a vision plan
organization shall require an optometrist’s written approval.
E. Vision plan organizations shall not:
1. Utilize an optometrist’s agreement to the contractual terms
of one group agreement for vision services to constitute approval to
another agreement to provide vision services;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1343 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. Change the terms, discounts, or reimbursement amounts during
the term of the optometrist’s agreement without written consent to
an amendment of the agreement;
3. Require or incentivize an optometrist to use certain vision
services;
4. Incentivize a subscriber to receive vision care services at
an entity owned, in whole or in part, by such vision plan
organization; or
5. Use extrapolation to complete an audit of an optometrist.
F. Any overpayment or underpayment due to an optometrist or any
refund to a vision service plan shall be based on actual overpayment
or underpayment and shall not be based on extrapolation.
G. Any entity providing vision care services that has any
ownership, in whole or in part, by a vision plan organization shall
notify subscribers of such ownership.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
February 5, 2026 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1343 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)